New Jersey, session 221, S2323.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Division of Developmental Disabilities in the Department of Human Services shall include on the department's website and make available in print to a member of the public, upon request, a comprehensive list of services and supports available from the division for individuals with developmental disabilities.  The list shall include: (1)   a detailed description of the different services and supports that are available from the division, including, but not limited to, those available through: the Supports Program under the federal demonstration project waiver authorized by section 1115 of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. s.1315(a); the Community Care Waiver authorized by section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. s.1396n(c); the self-directed services program pursuant to P.L.2008, c.128 (C.30:6D-12.1 et seq.); and any other program providing services and supports which are funded in whole, or in part, by the division; (2)   the specific criteria for eligibility for each program described pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, which shall, at a minimum, include any requirements for: application for and maintenance of eligibility for the Medicaid program; the level of care needed by the individual with a developmental disability seeking services and supports from the division; an assessment of the needs of the individual with a developmental disability, and the different amounts of funding to be made available for services and supports for the individual based on those needs, as applicable; and (3)   information about the availability of transitional planning for individuals with developmental disabilities, guardianship services from the division, and any other information that the division deems necessary to help an individual with a developmental disability obtain services and supports from the division. b.    The division shall: (1)   update the list prepared pursuant to this section as necessary to ensure that the list reflects a current and comprehensive list of available services and supports; and (2)   prominently display on the website of the department or include with any printed materials that are made available to the public, as appropriate, information about any webinars or other presentations offered by the division that may help an individual with a developmental disability obtain services and supports from the division. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment.